Louisiana, session 2026, HB718.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2791.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2791.2. Limitation of liability for aeronautical activities at nonpublic use airports;
private landowners
A. As used in this Section:
(1) "Aeronautical activities" means the act or practice of the art and science
of transportation by aircraft and operations, construction, repair, or maintenance of
aircraft, airports, landing fields, landing strips, air navigation of, or flight in, or air
instruction.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 718 ENROLLED
(2) "Charge" means the admission price or fee required in return for
permission to use lands, but does not include the following:
(a) The sharing of game, fish, or other products of recreational use.
(b) Contributions in kind, services, or cash paid to reduce or offset costs and
eliminate losses from recreational use.
(c) Donations made during aeronautical activities at nonpublic use airports.
(3) "Land" means urban or rural land, roads, water, watercourses, airstrips,
private ways and buildings, structures, including machinery or equipment when
attached to immovable property.
(4) "Malicious" means an intentional act of misconduct that the actor knows
or should have known is likely to result in harm. The term shall not include
negligent or reckless conduct.
(5) "Nonpublic use airport" means an airport that is primarily used by the
owner with access by others without a charge as permitted by the owner.
(6) "Owner" means the possessor of a fee interest, a tenant, lessee, occupant,
or person in control of the premises.
(7) "Person" means individuals regardless of age.
(8) "Recreational purpose" includes aeronautical activities at nonpublic use
airports.
B. Except for willful or malicious failure to warn against a dangerous
condition, use, structure, or activity, an owner of a nonpublic use airport shall not be
liable for any loss or damage to any person on the owner's property when the loss or
damage is related to an emergency landing of an aircraft, except an owner of
commercial recreational developments or facilities, who permits with or without
charge any person to use his land for recreational purposes as defined in this
Subsection.
C. Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the provisions of Subsection B of this
Section shall be deemed applicable to the duties and liability of an owner of land
leased for recreational purposes to the federal government, including any state or
political subdivision thereof, or private persons.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 718 ENROLLED
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to relieve any person using the
land of another for recreational purposes from any obligation which he may have in
the absence of this Section to exercise care in his use of such land and in his
activities thereon, or from the legal consequences of failing to employ such care.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.